Florida, session 2026, SB254.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âSubsection (5) is added to section 464.008, 56 Florida Statutes, and subsection (1) of that section is 57 republished, to read: 58 464.008âLicensure by examination.â 59 (1)âAny person desiring to be licensed as a registered 60 nurse or licensed practical nurse shall apply to the department 61 to take the licensure examination. The department shall examine 62 each applicant who: 63 (a)âHas completed the application form and remitted a fee 64 set by the board not to exceed $150 and has remitted an 65 examination fee set by the board not to exceed $75 plus the 66 actual per applicant cost to the department for purchase of the 67 examination from the National Council of State Boards of Nursing 68 or a similar national organization. 69 (b)âHas provided sufficient information on or after October 70 1, 1989, which must be submitted by the department for a 71 statewide criminal records correspondence check through the 72 Department of Law Enforcement. 73 (c)âIs in good mental and physical health, is a recipient 74 of a high school diploma or the equivalent, and has completed 75 the requirements for: 76 1.âGraduation from an approved program; 77 2.âGraduation from a prelicensure nursing education program 78 that the board determines is equivalent to an approved program; 79 3.âGraduation on or after July 1, 2009, from an accredited 80 program; or 81 4.âGraduation before July 1, 2009, from a prelicensure 82 nursing education program whose graduates at that time were 83 eligible for examination. 84 85 Courses successfully completed in a professional nursing 86 education program that are at least equivalent to a practical 87 nursing education program may be used to satisfy the education 88 requirements for licensure as a licensed practical nurse. 89 (d)âHas the ability to communicate in the English language, 90 which may be determined by an examination given by the 91 department. 92 (5)(a)âThe department shall issue a temporary provisional 93 license to an applicant who is eligible to take the licensure 94 examination under subsection (1) and who seeks to practice as a 95 graduate registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, as 96 applicable. 97 (b)âA temporary provisional license issued under this 98 subsection: 99 1.âIs valid for a period not to exceed 180 days after the 100 date of issuance. 101 2.âIs nonrenewable. 102 3.âAutomatically expires upon the applicant passing the 103 licensure examination and the department issuing of a full 104 license, or upon the applicantâs failure to pass the 105 examination. 106 (c)âA temporary provisional licensee may practice only 107 under the direct supervision of a registered nurse or licensed 108 practical nurse, as applicable, who has filed a written protocol 109 with the department. The board shall adopt rules to implement 110 this paragraph. 111 Section 2.âSubsections (1) through (6) and (8) and 112 paragraph (f) of subsection (11) of section 464.019, Florida 113 Statutes, are amended to read: 114 464.019âApproval of nursing education programs.â 115 (1)âPROGRAM APPLICATION.âAn educational institution that 116 wishes to conduct a program in this state for the prelicensure 117 education of professional or practical nurses must submit to the 118 department a program application and review fee of $1,000 for 119 each prelicensure nursing education program to be offered at the 120 institutionâs main campus, branch campus, or other instructional 121 site. The program application must include the legal name of the 122 educational institution, the legal name of the nursing education 123 program, the legal name of the nursing education program 124 director, and, if such institution is accredited, the name of 125 the accrediting agency. The application must also document that: 126 (a)1.âFor a professional nursing education program, the 127 program director and at least 50 percent of the programâs 128 faculty members are registered nurses who have a masterâs or 129 higher degree in nursing or a bachelorâs degree in nursing and a 130 masterâs or higher degree in a field related to nursing. 131 2.âFor a practical nursing education program, the program 132 director and at least 50 percent of the programâs faculty 133 members are registered nurses who have a bachelorâs or higher 134 degree in nursing. 135 136 The educational degree requirements of this paragraph must may 137 be documented by an official transcript or by a written 138 statement from the program director of the educational 139 institution verifying that the institution conferred the degree. 140 The program director shall certify the official transcript or 141 written statement as true and accurate. 142 (b)âThe programâs nursing major curriculum consists of at 143 least: 144 1.âFifty percent clinical training in the United States, 145 the District of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the 146 United States for a practical nursing education program, an 147 associate degree professional nursing education program, or a 148 professional diploma nursing education program. 149 2.âForty percent clinical training in the United States, 150 the District of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the 151 United States for a bachelorâs degree professional nursing 152 education program. 153 (c)âNo more than 50 percent of the programâs clinical 154 training consists of clinical simulation. 155 (d)âThe program has signed agreements with each agency, 156 facility, and organization included in the curriculum plan as 157 clinical training sites and community-based clinical experience 158 sites. 159 (e)âThe program has written policies for faculty which 160 include provisions for direct or indirect supervision by program 161 faculty or clinical preceptors for students in clinical training 162 consistent with the following standards: 163 1.âThe number of program faculty members equals at least 164 one faculty member directly supervising every 12 students unless 165 the written agreement between the program and the agency, 166 facility, or organization providing clinical training sites 167 allows more students, not to exceed 18 students, to be directly 168 supervised by one program faculty member. 169 2.âFor a hospital setting, indirect supervision may occur 170 only if there is direct supervision by an assigned clinical 171 preceptor, a supervising program faculty member is available by 172 telephone, and such arrangement is approved by the clinical 173 facility. 174 3.âFor community-based clinical experiences that involve 175 student participation in invasive or complex nursing activities, 176 students must be directly supervised by a program faculty member 177 or clinical preceptor and such arrangement must be approved by 178 the community-based clinical facility. 179 4.âFor community-based clinical experiences not subject to 180 subparagraph 3., indirect supervision may occur only when a 181 supervising program faculty member is available to the student 182 by telephone. 183 184 A programâs policies established under this paragraph must 185 require that a clinical preceptor who is supervising students in 186 a professional nursing education program be a registered nurse 187 or, if supervising students in a practical nursing education 188 program, be a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse. 189 (f)âThe professional or practical nursing curriculum plan 190 documents clinical experience and theoretical instruction in 191 medical, surgical, obstetric, pediatric, and geriatric nursing. 192 A professional nursing curriculum plan must shall also document 193 clinical experience and theoretical instruction in psychiatric 194 nursing. Each curriculum plan must document clinical training 195 experience in appropriate settings that include, but are not 196 limited to, acute care, long-term care, and community settings. 197 (g)âThe professional or practical nursing education program 198 provides theoretical instruction and clinical application in 199 personal, family, and community health concepts; nutrition; 200 human growth and development throughout the life span; body 201 structure and function; interpersonal relationship skills; 202 mental health concepts; pharmacology and administration of 203 medications; and legal aspects of practice. A professional 204 nursing education program must also provide theoretical 205 instruction and clinical application in interpersonal 206 relationships and leadership skills; professional role and 207 function; and health teaching and counseling skills. 208 (h)âThe professional or practical nursing education program 209 has established evaluation and standardized admission criteria. 210 The admission criteria must, at a minimum, identify those 211 students who are likely to need additional preparation and 212 educational support to be successful program graduates. The 213 program must maintain documentation of the individualized 214 student academic support plan for those students identified as 215 in need of additional preparation and educational support. 216 (i)âFor each student, the professional or practical nursing 217 education program administers an exit examination that is a 218 national, standardized, and comprehensive predictor exam 219 designed to help nursing students assess their readiness for the 220 National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing 221 Examination (NCLEX) by identifying areas needing further study 222 and remediation. A student may not be excluded from graduation 223 on the sole basis of the exit examination if the student has 224 otherwise successfully completed all coursework required by the 225 program. 226 (j)âThe professional or practical nursing education program 227 has submitted to the board the established criteria for 228 remediation that will be offered to students who do not 229 successfully pass the exit examination. 230 (k)âBeginning August 1, 2027, a program with a passage rate 231 more than 10 percentage points lower than the average national 232 passage rate during the same calendar year for graduates of 233 comparable degree programs who are United States-educated, 234 first-time test takers on the NCLEX, as calculated by the 235 contract testing service of the National Council of State Boards 236 of Nursing, offers a graduate nursing preceptorship to its 237 graduates. If a graduate from such a program does not pass the 238 NCLEX at the conclusion of his or her preceptorship, the 239 professional or practical nursing education program must offer 240 remediation to the graduate for free. 241 1.âAll programs are encouraged to offer a graduate nursing 242 preceptorship to their graduates to provide opportunities for 243 job shadowing, clinical training, nonclinical training, and 244 patient care in a hospital setting. Graduates who have been 245 issued a temporary provisional license under s. 464.008(5) may 246 participate in such preceptorships. A graduate nursing 247 preceptorship must last for 3 months, with the expectation that 248 graduates will take the NCLEX at the conclusion of the 249 preceptorship. Clinical preceptors shall oversee the 250 preceptorship programs. 251 2.âBy January 1, 2027, the Florida Center for Nursing shall 252 establish standards for graduate nursing preceptorships, 253 including supervision requirements. The board shall incorporate 254 the standards into rule. 255 (2)âPROGRAM APPROVAL.â 256 (a)âUpon receipt of a program application and review fee, 257 the department shall examine the application to determine if it 258 is complete. If the application is not complete, the department 259 must shall notify the educational institution in writing of any 260 errors or omissions within 30 days after the departmentâs 261 receipt of the application. A program application is deemed 262 complete upon the departmentâs receipt of: 263 1.âThe initial application, if the department does not 264 notify the educational institution of any errors or omissions 265 within the 30-day period; or 266 2.âA revised application that corrects each error and 267 omission of which the department notifies the educational 268 institution within the 30-day period. 269 (b)âFollowing the departmentâs receipt of a complete 270 program application, the board may conduct an onsite evaluation 271 if necessary to document the applicantâs compliance with 272 subsection (1). Within 90 days after the departmentâs receipt of 273 a complete program application, the board shall: 274 1.âApprove the application if it documents compliance with 275 subsection (1); or 276 2.âProvide the educational institution with a notice of 277 intent to deny the application if it does not document 278 compliance with subsection (1). The notice must specify written 279 reasons for the boardâs denial of the application. The board may 280 not deny a program application because of an educational 281 institutionâs failure to correct an error or omission that the 282 department failed to provide notice of to the institution within 283 the 30-day notice period under paragraph (a). The educational 284 institution may request a hearing on the notice of intent to 285 deny the program application pursuant to chapter 120. 286 (c)âA program application is deemed approved if the board 287 does not act within the 90-day review period provided under 288 paragraph (b). 289 (d)âUpon the boardâs approval of a program application, the 290 program becomes an approved program. 291 (e)âThe board shall deny an application from a program that 292 has had adverse action taken against it by another regulatory 293 jurisdiction in the United States. The board may also revoke the 294 approval of an existing approved program that has had adverse 295 action taken against it by another regulatory jurisdiction in 296 the United States. For purposes of this paragraph, the term 297 âadverse actionâ means any administrative, civil, or criminal 298 action imposed by a licensing board or other state authority 299 against a program. The term includes actions such as revocation, 300 suspension, probation, or any other encumbrance affecting the 301 programâs authorization to operate. 302 (3)âANNUAL REPORT.âBy November 1 of each year, each 303 approved programâs director program shall submit to the board an 304 annual report consisting comprised of an affidavit certifying 305 continued compliance with subsection (1), a summary description 306 of the programâs compliance with subsection (1), and 307 documentation for the previous academic year that, to the extent 308 applicable, describes: 309 (a)âThe number of student applications received, qualified 310 applicants, applicants accepted, accepted applicants who enroll 311 in the program, students enrolled in the program, and program 312 graduates. 313 (b)âThe programâs retention rates for students tracked from 314 program entry to graduation. 315 (c)âThe programâs accreditation status, including 316 identification of the accrediting agency. 317 318 The board must terminate the program pursuant to chapter 120 if 319 the requirements of this subsection are not met. Upon request, 320 the board may give an extension for good cause not to exceed 60 321 days for a program to meet the requirements of this subsection. 322 If a program director is found to be in violation of this 323 subsection, the board may impose a penalty listed in s. 324 456.072(2). 325 (4)âINTERNET WEBSITE.âThe board shall publish the following 326 information on its Internet website: 327 (a)âA list of each accredited program conducted in the 328 state and the programâs graduate passage rates for the most 329 recent 2 calendar years, which the department shall determine 330 through the following sources: 331 1.âFor a programâs accreditation status, the specialized 332 accrediting agencies that are nationally recognized by the 333 United States Secretary of Education to accredit nursing 334 education programs. 335 2.âFor a programâs graduate passage rates, the contract 336 testing service of the National Council of State Boards of 337 Nursing. 338 (b)âThe following data for each approved program, which 339 includes, to the extent applicable: 340 1.âAll documentation provided by the program in its program 341 application. 342 2.âThe summary description of the programâs compliance 343 submitted under subsection (3). 344 3.âThe programâs accreditation status, including 345 identification of the accrediting agency. 346 4.âThe programâs probationary status. 347 5.âThe programâs graduate passage rates for the most recent 348 2 calendar years. 349 6.âEach programâs retention rates for students tracked from 350 program entry to graduation. 351 (c)âThe average passage rates for United States educated, 352 first-time test takers on the National Council of State Boards 353 of Nursing Licensing Examination for the most recent 2 calendar 354 years, as calculated by the contract testing service of the 355 National Council of State Boards of Nursing. The average passage 356 rates shall be published separately for each type of comparable 357 degree program listed in subparagraph (5)(a)1., and individually 358 for each approved nursing program. 359 360 The information required to be published under this subsection 361 shall be made available in a manner that allows interactive 362 searches and comparisons of individual programs selected by the 363 website user. The board shall update the Internet website at 364 least quarterly with the available information. 365 (5)âACCOUNTABILITY.â 366 (a)1.âAn approved program must achieve a graduate passage 367 rate for first-time test takers which is not more than 10 368 percentage points lower than the average passage rate during the 369 same calendar year for graduates of comparable degree programs 370 who are United States educated, first-time test takers on the 371 National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing 372 Examination, as calculated by the contract testing service of 373 the National Council of State Boards of Nursing. For purposes of 374 this subparagraph, an approved program is comparable to all 375 degree programs of the same program type from among the 376 following program types: 377 a.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 378 in a bachelorâs degree. 379 b.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 380 in an associate degree. 381 c.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 382 in a diploma. 383 d.âPractical nursing education programs. 384 2.âIf an approved programâs graduate passage rates do not 385 equal or exceed the required passage rates for 2 consecutive 386 calendar years, the board must shall place the program on 387 probationary status pursuant to chapter 120 and the program 388 director must submit a written remediation plan to the board. 389 The program director must shall appear before the board to 390 present the a plan for remediation, which must shall include 391 specific nationally recognized benchmarks to identify progress 392 toward a graduate passage rate goal. The board must terminate a 393 program pursuant to chapter 120 if the program director fails to 394 submit a written remediation plan or fails to appear before the 395 board and present the remediation plan no later than 6 months 396 after the date of the program being placed on probation. The 397 board may impose a penalty listed in s. 456.072(2) on the 398 program director for such failure. The program must remain on 399 probationary status until it achieves a graduate passage rate 400 that equals or exceeds the required passage rate for any 1 401 calendar year. The board must shall deny a program application 402 for a new prelicensure nursing education program submitted by an 403 educational institution if the institution has an existing 404 program that is already on probationary status. 405 3.âUpon the programâs achievement of a graduate passage 406 rate that equals or exceeds the required passage rate, the 407 board, at its next regularly scheduled meeting following release 408 of the programâs graduate passage rate by the National Council 409 of State Boards of Nursing, shall remove the programâs 410 probationary status. If the program, during the 2 calendar years 411 following its placement on probationary status, does not achieve 412 the required passage rate for any 1 calendar year, the board 413 must may extend the programâs probationary status for 1 414 additional year, provided the program has demonstrated adequate 415 progress toward the graduate passage rate goal by meeting a 416 majority of the benchmarks established in the remediation plan. 417 If the program is not granted the 1-year extension or fails to 418 achieve the required passage rate by the end of such extension, 419 the board shall terminate the program pursuant to chapter 120. 420 (b)âIf an approved program fails to submit the annual 421 report required in subsection (3), the board must shall notify 422 the program director and president or chief executive officer of 423 the educational institution in writing within 15 days after the 424 due date of the annual report. The program director must shall 425 appear before the board at the boardâs next regularly scheduled 426 meeting to explain the reason for the delay. The board must 427 shall terminate the program pursuant to chapter 120 if the 428 program director fails to appear before the board, as required 429 under this paragraph, or if the program does not submit the 430 annual report within 6 months after the due date. 431 (c)âA nursing education program, whether accredited or 432 nonaccredited, which has been placed on probationary status must 433 shall disclose its probationary status in writing to the 434 programâs students and applicants. The notification must include 435 an explanation of the implications of the programâs probationary 436 status on the students or applicants. 437 (d)âIf students from a program that is terminated pursuant 438 to this subsection transfer to an approved or an accredited 439 program under the direction of the Commission for Independent 440 Education, the board must shall recalculate the passage rates of 441 the programs receiving the transferring students, excluding the 442 test scores of those students transferring more than 12 credits. 443 (e)âDuly authorized agents or employees of the department 444 may conduct onsite evaluations or inspections at any time during 445 business hours to ensure that approved programs or accredited 446 programs are in full compliance with this chapter, or to 447 determine whether this chapter or s. 456.072 is being violated. 448 The department may collect any necessary evidence needed to 449 ensure compliance with this chapter or for prosecution, as 450 deemed necessary. A program that refuses or fails to allow an 451 onsite evaluation or inspection is deemed in violation of a 452 legal obligation imposed by the board or the department. 453 (6)âDISCLOSURE OF GRADUATE PASSAGE RATE DATA.â 454 (a)âFor each graduate of the program included in the 455 calculation of the programâs graduate passage rate, the 456 department shall disclose to the program director, upon his or 457 her written request, the name, examination date, and 458 determination of whether each graduate passed or failed the 459 National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing 460 Examination, if such information is provided to the department 461 by the contract testing service of the National Council of State 462 Boards of Nursing. The department shall disclose to the program 463 director the average passage rate for graduates from its program 464 written request must specify the calendar years for which the 465 information is requested. 466 (b)âA program director to whom confidential information 467 exempt from public disclosure pursuant to s. 456.014 is 468 disclosed under this subsection must maintain the 469 confidentiality of the information and is subject to the same 470 penalties provided in s. 456.082 for department employees who 471 unlawfully disclose confidential information. 472 (c)âThe program director shall ensure that the graduate 473 average passage rate, as reported by the department, is posted 474 on the programâs website. 475 (8)âRULEMAKING.âThe board does not have rulemaking 476 authority to administer this section, except that the board 477 shall adopt rules that prescribe the format for submitting 478 program applications under subsection (1) and annual reports 479 under subsection (3), to implement graduate nursing 480 preceptorships as established in paragraph (1)(k), to enforce 481 and administer subsection (5), and to administer the 482 documentation of the accreditation of nursing education programs 483 under subsection (11). The board may adopt rules relating to the 484 nursing curriculum, including rules relating to the uses and 485 limitations of simulation technology, and rules relating to the 486 criteria to qualify for an extension of time to meet the 487 accreditation requirements under paragraph (11)(f). The board 488 may not impose any condition or requirement on an educational 489 institution submitting a program application, an approved 490 program, or an accredited program, except as expressly provided 491 in this section. 492 (11)âACCREDITATION REQUIRED.â 493 (f)âAn approved nursing education program may, no sooner 494 than 90 days before the deadline for meeting the accreditation 495 requirements of this subsection, apply to the board for an 496 extension of the accreditation deadline for a period which does 497 not exceed 2 years. An additional extension may not be granted. 498 In order to be eligible for the extension, the approved program 499 must establish that it has a graduate passage rate of 60 percent 500 or higher on the National Council of State Boards of Nursing 501 Licensing Examination for the most recent calendar year and must 502 meet a majority of the boardâs additional criteria, including, 503 but not limited to, all of the following: 504 1.âA student retention rate of 60 percent or higher for the 505 most recent calendar year. 506 2.âA graduate work placement rate of 70 percent or higher 507 for the most recent calendar year. 508 3.âThe program has applied for approval or been approved by 509 an institutional or programmatic accreditor recognized by the 510 United States Department of Education. 511 4.âThe program is in full compliance with subsections (1) 512 and (3) and paragraph (5)(b). 513 5.âThe program is not currently in its second year of 514 probationary status under subsection (5). 515 516 The applicable deadline under this paragraph is tolled from the 517 date on which an approved program applies for an extension until 518 the date on which the board issues a decision on the requested 519 extension. 520 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.